Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Special Designations of Portions of Highway System and Bridges
§ 65-3-71.108.
“State Trooper Ralph Newell Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 49 in Covington County beginning one (1) mile south of its intersection with Mississippi Highway 35 and extending northwesterly for two (2) miles is designated and shall be known as the “State Trooper Ralph Newell Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 545, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2007.).

§ 65-3-71.109.
“Richard Wright Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 84 in Adams County, beginning at its intersection with Hobo Forks and extending easterly to the Adams/Franklin County line, designated and shall be known as the “Richard Wright Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 302, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 21, 2008.).

§ 65-3-71.110.
Bridge on Mississippi Highway 9 spanning Skuna River in Calhoun County designated “Military Order of the Purple Heart, Department of Mississippi, Memorial Bridge.”

That bridge on Mississippi Highway 9 in Calhoun County that spans the Skuna River is designated and shall be known as the “Military Order of the Purple Heart, Department of Mississippi, Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate plaques at each end of the bridge described in subsection (1) of this section, and suitable markers along and approaching the bridge, reflecting its name.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 545, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2007.).

§ 65-3-71.111.
“Hilton ‘Ike’ Shoemake Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 84 in Wayne County beginning at the Jones/Wayne County line and extending easterly to its intersection with Pleasant Grove-Strengthford Road, is designated and shall be known as the “Hilton ‘Ike’ Shoemake Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 344, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 26, 2008.).

§ 65-3-71.112.
“Dudley R. Bozeman Memorial Highway” designated.

Proposed new Mississippi Highway 22 Alternate in Hinds and Madison Counties beginning at or near Edwards and extending northeasterly to or near Canton shall be designated and shall be known, upon completion, as the “Dudley R. Bozeman Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 345, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 26, 2008.).

§ 65-3-71.113.
“Dr. Gilbert R. Mason, Sr., Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 90 in the City of Biloxi beginning at Rodenberg Avenue and extending easterly to Porter Avenue, is designated and shall be known as the “Dr. Gilbert R. Mason, Sr., Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 346, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 26, 2008.).

§ 65-3-71.114.
“Cpl. Dustin Jerome Lee Memorial Highway” designated.

Mississippi Highway 393 in Winston County is designated and shall be known as the “Cpl. Dustin Jerome Lee Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 347, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 26, 2008.).

§ 65-3-71.115.
“James C. Simpson, Sr., Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 90 in the City of Pass Christian between Davis Avenue and Market Street is designated and shall be known as the “James C. Simpson, Sr., Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 349, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 26, 2008.).

§ 65-3-71.116.
“James ‘Diddio’ McDaniel and Stayce Wilkinson Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 16 in Yazoo County beginning at the Big Black River and extending northwesterly to its intersection with U.S. Highway 49 is designated and shall be known as the “James ‘Diddio’ McDaniel and Stayce Wilkinson Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 350, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 26, 2008.).

§ 65-3-71.117.
“Dr. W.W. Walley Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 84 in Wayne County beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 184 and extending northeasterly to the Mississippi/Alabama state line is designated and shall be known as the “Dr. W.W. Walley Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 351, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 26, 2008.).

§ 65-3-71.118.
“Billy Lancaster Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 51 in Montgomery County beginning at the northern corporate limits of the City of Winona and extending northerly to the Montgomery/Grenada County line is designated and shall be known as the “Billy Lancaster Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 371, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 31, 2008.).

§ 65-3-71.119.
“Mallory-Davis Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 12 in Holmes County beginning at the eastern corporate limits of the City of Lexington and extending easterly to the corporate limits of the City of Durant is designated and shall be known as the “Mallory-Davis Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 376, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 31, 2008.).

§ 65-3-71.120.
“W.C. ‘Bill’ Hancock Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 305 in Tate County from its intersection with Mississippi 306 to its intersection with Pryor Road shall be known as the “W.C. ‘Bill’ Hancock Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 482, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 14, 2008.).

§ 65-3-71.121.
“James Arnold Flowers Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 184 in Jones County beginning one-half (1/2) mile east of I-59 and extending easterly to its intersection with U.S. Highway 84 is designated and shall be known as the “James Arnold Flowers Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 482, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 14, 2008.).

§ 65-3-71.122.
“Judith Toups Least Tern Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 90 within the City of Gulfport between Cowan Road and Debuys Road is designated and shall be known as the “Judith Toups Least Tern Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 490, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2008.).

§ 65-3-71.123.
“Major Michael Green Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 90 in the City of Gautier between Oak Street and Shamrock Court is designated and shall be known as the “Major Michael Green Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 490, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2008.).

§ 65-3-71.124.
“Highway 61, the Blues Highway” designated.

U.S. Highway 61 in the State of Mississippi is designated and shall be known as “Highway 61, the Blues Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 510, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 7, 2008.).

§ 65-3-71.125.
“Juanell Lollar Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 82 in Montgomery County beginning at the western corporate limit of the Town of Kilmichael and extending easterly to the eastern corporate limit of the Town of Kilmichael, is designated and shall be known as the “Juanell Lollar Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 304, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-71.126.
“Charles H. Mason Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 17 in Holmes County beginning at the northern corporate boundary of Lexington and extending northerly to its intersection with Bellbottom Road, is designated and shall be known as the “Charles H. Mason Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 309, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-71.127.
“John Stewart Watson Memorial Highway” designated.

That Mississippi State Highway No. 17, running from Pickens in Holmes County to Carrollton in Carroll County, excluding that segment in Holmes County beginning at the northern corporate boundary of Lexington and extending northerly to its intersection with Bellbottom Road, is hereby designated the John Stewart Watson Memorial Highway; and the Highway Department of the State of Mississippi is hereby directed to appropriately mark such highway with suitable memorial markers in accordance with the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1954, ch. 299, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 309, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-71.128.
“Corporal James Calvin ‘Jamie’ Walker Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 84 in Wayne County beginning at its westernmost intersection with Mississippi Highway 184 and extending westerly to its intersection with John Dykes Road, is designated and shall be known as the “Corporal James Calvin ‘Jamie’ Walker Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 310, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-71.129.
“Lieutenant Robert J. Curry Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 49 beginning at the intersection with Community Road and extending northerly to its intersection with Dedeaux Road is designated and shall be known as the “Lieutenant Robert J. Curry Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 312, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 3, 2009.).

§ 65-3-71.130.
“David R. Brown Memorial Bridge” designated.

That bridge on Interstate 59 in the City of Laurel in Jones County between Beacon Street to the south of the bridge and Fourth Avenue to the north of the bridge shall be known as the “David R. Brown Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate plaques at each end of the bridge, and suitable markers along and approaching the bridge, reflecting its name.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 313, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-71.131.
“William W. ‘Bill’ Ramsey Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 465 in Warren County beginning at its intersection with U.S. Highway 61 and extending westerly to its easternmost intersection with the Issaquena County line, is designated and shall be known as the “William W. ‘Bill’ Ramsey Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 314, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-71.132.
“Leo W. Seal, Jr., Memorial Bridge” designated.

The bridge on U.S. Highway 90 in Mississippi that spans the Gulf of Mexico and St. Louis Bay between the municipalities of Bay St. Louis and Pass Christian is designated and shall be known as the “Leo W. Seal, Jr., Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs and markers along and approaching, and at each end of, the bridge described in subsection (1) of this section, reflecting its name and the contributions made by the late Mr. Seal as a prominent economic development leader of the Mississippi Gulf Coast and a dedicated philanthropist and supporter of education throughout the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 315, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 3, 2009.).

§ 65-3-71.133.
“Officer Larry DeWayne Lee Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Interstate 10 within the corporate limits of the City of Moss Point from Mississippi Highway 63 to Veterans Memorial Bridge is designated and shall be known as “Officer Larry DeWayne Lee Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 351, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-71.134.
“Louis Jackson Boulevard” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 63 within the corporate limits of the City of Moss Point is designated and shall be known as “Louis Jackson Boulevard.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 423, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-71.135.
“Jackson County Veterans Memorial Bridge” designated.

The bridge on U.S. Highway 90 in Jackson County that spans the East Pascagoula River is designated and shall be known as the “Jackson County Veterans Memorial Bridge.”

The Transportation Department shall erect and maintain an appropriate plaque at each end of the bridge and suitable markers along and approaching the bridge.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 453, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-71.136.
“Veterans Memorial Bypass” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 82 that bypasses the City of Columbus from its intersection with U.S. Highway 45 South and extending easterly to the Mississippi/Alabama line is designated and shall be known as the “Veterans Memorial Bypass.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 453, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-71.137.
“George ‘Happy’ Irby Parkway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 786 in Lowndes County beginning at U.S. Highway 45 and extending to the gate of the Columbus Air Force Base is designated and shall be known as the “George ‘Happy’ Irby Parkway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 453, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-71.138.
“Van T. Barfoot Medal of Honor Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 16 in Leake County beginning at the intersection of Mississippi Highway 16 and Mississippi Highway 35 and extending easterly to the Leake/Neshoba county line is designated and shall be known as “Van T. Barfoot Medal of Honor Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 453, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-71.139.
“Manning Boulevard” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 49-W within the corporate limits of the City of Drew is designated and shall be known as “Manning Boulevard.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 453, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-71.140.
“Jack Lucas Medal of Honor Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 49 in Forrest County beginning at the intersection of U.S. Highway 49 and Hardy Street in Hattiesburg and extending southerly to the Forrest/Stone county line is designated and shall be known as “Jack Lucas Medal of Honor Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 466, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-71.141.
“Phyllis Hawkins Harper Interchange” designated.

The Dorsey-Fawn Grove intersection in Itawamba County on United States Highway 78 (future I-22) shall be known as “Phyllis Hawkins Harper Interchange.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the intersection described in subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 466, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-71.142.
“Donald R. Chambliss, Sr. Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 302, known as Goodman Road, within the corporate limits of the City of Southaven is designated and shall be known as the “Donald R. Chambliss, Sr. Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 541, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2009.).

§ 65-3-71.143.
“Bobby H. Johnson Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 72 within the corporate limits of the Town of Burnsville is designated and shall be known as the “Bobby H. Johnson Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 541, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2009.).

§ 65-3-71.144.
Memorial intersection for Jack Lewis Dudley designated.

The intersection of U.S. Highway 45 and Mississippi Highway 16 in Scooba, Mississippi, is designated as a memorial intersection for Jack Lewis Dudley.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs at the intersection to read as follows: “Birthplace of World Champion Turkey Caller Jack Lewis Dudley.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 541, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2009.).

§ 65-3-71.145.
“Representative Fred Dobbins Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 63 in Greene County located within one-half (1/2) mile north and south of the entrance to the Southeast Mississippi Correctional Institution, is designated and shall be known as the “Representative Fred Dobbins Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 331, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 65-3-71.146.
“John W. Shaw, Sr., Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 310 in Marshall County beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 7 and extending southerly to the Lafayette County line, is designated and shall be known as the “John W. Shaw, Sr., Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 333, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 65-3-71.147.
“Dr. T.R.M. Howard Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 161 in Bolivar County beginning at its intersection with the northern corporate limits of the City of Mound Bayou and extending southerly to the southern corporate limits of the City of Mound Bayou, is designated and shall be known as the “Dr. T.R.M. Howard Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 333, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 65-3-71.148.
“Jeffery Rugheimer Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 90 in the City of Pascagoula from Pascagoula Street to 14th Street is designated and shall be known as the “Jeffery Rugheimer Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 443, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 65-3-71.149.
“Nathaniel Smith, Jr. Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 90 in the City of Pascagoula from 14th Street to Chicot Street is designated and shall be known as the “Nathaniel Smith, Jr. Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 443, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 65-3-71.150.
“Terry Micheal Byrd Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 90 in the City of Pascagoula from Chicot Street to Mississippi Highway 611 is designated and shall be known as the “Terry Micheal Byrd Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 443, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 65-3-71.151.
“Tammy Wynette Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 23 in Itawamba County beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 178 and extending northerly to the Mississippi/Alabama state line is designated and shall be known as the “Tammy Wynette Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 444, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 65-3-71.152.
“Ken Lundberg Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 51 in Grenada County beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 8 and extending to the southern corporate limits of the City of Grenada is designated and shall be known as the “Ken Lundberg Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 445, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 65-3-71.153.
“Veteran’s Memorial Bridge” designated.

That bridge located on D’Iberville Boulevard, also identified as Old Mississippi Highway 67, in Harrison County that traverses over Interstate 10 is designated and shall be known as the “Veteran’s Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching, and at each end of, the bridge described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 445, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 65-3-71.154.
“Dr. Aaron E. Henry Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 161 in Coahoma County beginning at its northern county line and extending southerly to its southern county line, is designated and shall be known as the “Dr. Aaron E. Henry Memorial Highway.”

The segment of U.S. Highway 61 in Coahoma County, Mississippi, beginning at its northern intersection with Mississippi Highway 161 and extending southerly to its southern intersection with Mississippi Highway 161, is designated and shall be known as the “Dr. Aaron E. Henry Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 549, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 375, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 65-3-71.155.
“Staff Sergeant Mark Haskin Eaton Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 531 within Smith County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with Mississippi 28 and extending to the Smith/Jasper county line shall be known and designated as the “Staff Sergeant Mark Haskin Eaton Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 305, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 22, 2011.).

§ 65-3-71.156.
“Euclatubba Memorial Crossing” designated.

That bridge which is constructed over U.S. Highway 45 at Euclatubba Road in Lee County is designated and shall be known as the “Euclatubba Memorial Crossing.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs approaching each end of the bridge described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 318, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.157.
“The Gulf Ordnance Plant Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 382 in Monroe County beginning at its intersection with U.S. Alternate Highway 45 and extending easterly to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 25, is designated and shall be known as “The Gulf Ordnance Plant Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 320, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.158.
“Dr. Walter Washington Memorial Parkway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 552 that lies within Jefferson and Claiborne Counties is designated and shall be known as the “Dr. Walter Washington Memorial Parkway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 320, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.159.
“Trooper Steve Hood Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 370 in Lee County beginning at the western boundary line of the City of Baldwyn and extending westerly to its intersection with Brices Cross Roads, is designated and shall be known as the “Trooper Steve Hood Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 319, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.160.
“Trooper Steve Gardner Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 51 in Copiah County beginning at its intersection with the northern corporate limits of the City of Hazlehurst and extending southerly to its intersection with Sinclair Street, is designated and shall be known as the “Trooper Steve Gardner Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 319, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.161.
“Blue Star Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 198 in Greene County beginning at its intersection with U.S. Highway 98 and extending southeasterly to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 57, is designated and shall be known as the “Blue Star Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 316, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.162.
“Rev. George W. Lee Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 49W that lies within Humphreys County, is designated and shall be known as the “Rev. George W. Lee Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 315, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.163.
“Mickey Gene Johnson Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 25 within the corporate limits of the Town of Belmont, Mississippi, shall be known and designated as the “Mickey Gene Johnson Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 336, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.164.
“Mississippi Gold Star Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Interstate 59 beginning at Exit 5 in the City of Picayune and extending northerly to the southern corporate limits of the City of Hattiesburg shall be known and designated as the “Mississippi Gold Star Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 335, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.165.
Mississippi Highway 6 in Pontotoc County designated “Military Order of the Purple Heart Highway.”

That segment of Mississippi Highway 6 within Pontotoc County, Mississippi, shall be known and designated as the “Military Order of the Purple Heart Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 334, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.166.
“Martin Luther King, Jr. Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 51 within the corporate limits of the Town of Coldwater, Mississippi, shall be known and designated as “Martin Luther King, Jr. Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 333, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.167.
“Sgt. Todd Partridge Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 84 within Adams County, Mississippi, shall be known and designated as “Sgt. Todd Partridge Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 332, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.168.
“Jefferson ‘Carl’ Monk, Jr. Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 11 within Jones County, Mississippi, beginning at the intersection of Mississippi Highway 11 North and Magnolia/Eratta Road and extending to its intersection at the Jones/Jasper County line shall be known and designated as “Jefferson ‘Carl’ Monk, Jr. Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 331, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.169.
“Chaplin Clark Polling Memorial Highway” designated.

That a certain segment of highway adjacent to Camp Shelby shall be known and designated as “Chaplin Clark Polling Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 328, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.170.
“Roger D. Moore Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 366 within Tishomingo County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with Mississippi 25 in the Town of Belmont and extending to North Patterson Street in the Town of Golden shall be known and designated as “Roger D. Moore Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 330, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.171.
“Willye B. White Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 49E beginning at the southern corporate limits of the City of Greenwood and extending southerly to the Town of Sidon shall be known and designated as the “Willye B. White Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 487, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.172.
“‘Mr. & Mrs. E.H. Sumner Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 82 located in Montgomery County beginning with its intersection with the Montgomery/Webster County line and extending westerly three and one-fourth (3-1/4) miles is designated and shall be known as the “Mr. & Mrs. E.H. Sumner Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 487, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.173.
“A.C. Hillman Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 98 located in George County beginning with its intersection with Mississippi Highway 198 and extending northerly to its intersection with the George/Greene County line, is designated and shall be known as the “A.C. Hillman Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 487, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.174.
“William S. ‘Seth’ Ricketts Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 72 located in Alcorn County within the town limits of the Town of Glen, is designated and shall be known as the “William S. ‘Seth’ Ricketts Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 487, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.175.
“Coach Sim Cooley Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 11 located in Jones County beginning with its intersection with the southern town limits of the Town of Sandersville and extending northerly to its intersection with Main Street, is designated and shall be known as the “Coach Sim Cooley Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 487, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.176.
“Walter W. Jack, Jr., Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 11 located in Jones County beginning with its intersection with Main Street in the Town of Sandersville and extending northerly to its intersection with the northern town limits of the Town of Sandersville, is designated and shall be known as the “Walter W. Jack, Jr., Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 487, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.177.
“Jack Cristil Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 82, also known as the 82 Bypass, located within the corporate limits of the City of Starkville shall be known and designated as the “Jack Cristil Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 487, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-3-71.178.
“Coach Ben B. James Sr. Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 84 in Covington County beginning at the eastern corporate limits of the City of Collins and extending easterly to the intersection of Mississippi Highway 588 and Salem School Road is designated and shall be known as the “Coach Ben B. James Sr. Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 304, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-3-71.179.
“Carl J. ‘Jack’ Gordon, Jr. Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 245 in Chickasaw County beginning at the Lee and Chickasaw county line and proceeding southerly to the northern corporate limits of the City of Okolona, is designated and shall be known as the Carl J. “Jack” Gordon, Jr. Memorial Highway.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that portion of Mississippi Highway 245.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 314, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-3-71.180.
“Martin Luther King, Jr., Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 51 in Holmes County that lies within the corporate limits of the Town of Goodman, is designated and shall be known as the “Martin Luther King, Jr., Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 330, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.